California, session 20252026, AB1244.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Senate Bill 743 (Chapter 386 of the Statutes of 2013) requires developers of transportation and land use projects to take actions to mitigate under the California Environmental Quality Act ((CEQA) (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code)) the environmental impact of the additional vehicle miles traveled generated by the project, with the stated intent to balance the needs of congestion management with statewide goals related to infill development, promotion of public health through active transportation, and reduction of greenhouse gas emissions. (b) Executive Order No. N-2-24 directs the Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Transportation Agency and the Office of Climate and Land Use Innovation, to identify opportunities to support the use of affordable infill housing as an environmental mitigation strategy. (c) The Governor’s proposed budget for the 2025-26 2025–26 fiscal year directs the state to promote policies that remove barriers to infill housing and support transit-oriented development. (d) Research definitively demonstrates that transit-oriented affordable housing significantly reduces vehicle miles traveled. Lower income households drive 25 percent to 30 percent fewer miles when living within one-half mile of transit. When living within one-quarter mile of frequent transit transit, they drive nearly 50 percent less. (e) A statewide fund that collects and distributes funding for infill affordable housing as a vehicle miles traveled mitigation strategy is one voluntary option by which developers of transportation and land use projects may choose to fulfill their mitigation requirements under CEQA.(f) A statewide approach provides efficiency, certainty, consistency, and a familiar process by which developers of affordable homes can access funding. SEC. 2. Section 21080.43 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.43. (a) For purposes of this section, “region” means the territory of the regional transportation planning agency with jurisdiction over the project.(b) (1) To the extent that a project is required to mitigate transportation impacts as determined by vehicle miles traveled metrics pursuant to this division, a project may satisfy the mitigation requirement by electing to contribute ____ dollars ($_____) for each vehicle mile traveled an amount, at a price per vehicle mile traveled that shall be determined, on or before July 1, 2026, by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, to the Transit–Oriented Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund established in Section 53561 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes of the Transit–Oriented Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program established pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 53560) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code. (2) On or before July 1, 2029, and at least once every three years thereafter, the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall update the price per vehicle mile traveled pursuant to paragraph (1) based on housing project costs and awards, vehicle miles traveled mitigated, and other factors relevant to housing projects funded by either the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program or the Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program.(c) The moneys contributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be available to the Department of Housing and Community Development, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to fund developments located within the same region as the project, in the following priority order:(1) First priority to developments within the same city as the project or for projects in unincorporated areas to developments in the same county.(2) Second priority to developments in the same county.(d) For each award using moneys contributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the Department of Housing and Community Development shall confirm the estimated reduction in vehicle miles traveled attributable to the award using the same method as that employed for the Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program.(e) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall post on its internet website, as part of the list of Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Program awards posted to its internet website at the conclusion of each funding round, all of the following information: (1) The name, location, and number of units in each development funded.(2) The total development cost and the amount of funds awarded to each development, including, but not limited to, the amount of funds contributed pursuant to this section.(3) The reduction in vehicle miles traveled estimated for each development and attributable to the award using the same method as that employed for the Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program.(4) The vehicle miles traveled mitigation obligations of each project that contributed funds pursuant to this section awarded during that round.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 2.___________________